Arkansas, session 2025, HB1043.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-6-213 is amended to read as follows:
7-6-213. Verification of reports.
All reports required to be filed by the provisions of this subchapter
shall be verified by affidavit by the candidate, or a person acting in the
candidate's behalf, a noncandidate expenditure committee, or a person acting
on behalf of the noncandidate expenditure committee stating that to the best
of his, or her, or its knowledge and belief the information so disclosed is a
complete, true, and accurate financial statement of the candidate's campaign
contributions or expenditures of the candidate or the noncandidate
*SSS009*
01-16-2025 13:29:01 SSS009

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1043
expenditure committee.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 7, Chapter 6, Subchapter 2, is amended
to add additional sections to read as follows:
7-6-234. Legislative findings and intent.
To protect public confidence in the integrity of appellate judicial
elections, it is necessary and proper for the State of Arkansas to:
(1) Require comprehensive disclosure of noncandidate
contributions and noncandidate expenditures in races for the Office of Judge
of the Court of Appeals or Office of Justice of the Supreme Court;
(2) Empower the Arkansas Ethics Commission, through its
rulemaking authority, to implement rules to govern noncandidate expenditures;
and
(3) Enhance enforcement of the law concerning noncandidate
expenditures that pertain to races for appellate judicial offices.

7-6-235. Noncandidate expenditures – Definitions.
As used in this section and §§ 7-6-213 and § 7-6-236 – 7-6-239:
(1) “Noncandidate expenditure”:
(A) Means an expenditure for an election that is:
(i) Not a contribution to a candidate’s campaign;
and
(ii) Not reported as an independent expenditure
under § 7-6-220;
(B) Pertains to a communication that:
(i) Names or provides a photograph or other image of
a specific candidate or specific set of candidates for the Office of Court of
Appeals Judge or Office of Supreme Court Justice within one hundred twenty
(120) days before an election for the Office of Court of Appeals Judge or
Office of Supreme Court Justice; and
(ii) Is targeted to or otherwise expected to be
received by one thousand (1,000) or more voters; and
(C) Does not include:
(i) A news article, editorial, or opinion article or
statement;
(a) That is printed, broadcasted, presented
01-16-2025 13:29:01 SSS009

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1043
electronically, or otherwise distributed by a newspaper, radio or television
broadcaster, or other for-profit media source; and
(b) For which no person other than the media
source has funded, purchased, or otherwise paid consideration for the article
or statement to be printed, broadcasted, presented electronically, or
otherwise distributed;
(ii) A communication between an organization and a
member of the organization as reflected in the organization's membership
records;
(iii) A communication between two (2) or more
members of an organization as reflected in the organization's membership
records; or
(iv) An informational guide to candidates
disseminated in printed form or on the internet that does not:
(a) Ask a voter or other person to contact a
candidate about the candidate's actions or positions, other than a
candidate's lack of response to a questionnaire; or
(b) Communicate an opinion on a specific
candidate or specific set of candidates; and
(2) “Noncandidate expenditure committee” means a person that:
(A) Accepts contributions from one (1) or more persons in
order to make a noncandidate expenditure for an appellate judicial election;
and
(B) Is registered as a noncandidate expenditure committee
under § 7-6-237 prior to making a noncandidate expenditure.

7-6-236. Contributions to noncandidate expenditure committees –
Noncandidate expenditures for appellate judicial elections — Reports.
(a) A person, including a noncandidate expenditure committee, that
accepts contributions or makes noncandidate expenditures in a calendar year
that exceed an aggregate amount or value of one thousand dollars ($1,000)
shall file a report with the Secretary of State no later than:
(1) Sixty (60) days before a preferential primary election,
general election, or special election, for the period ending sixty-five (65)
days before the preferential primary election, general election, or special
election;
01-16-2025 13:29:01 SSS009

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1043
(2) Thirty (30) days before a preferential primary election,
general election, or special election, covering the period ending thirty-five
(35) days before the preferential primary election, general election, or
special election;
(3) Seven (7) days before a preferential primary election,
general election, or special election covering the period ending ten (10)
days before the preferential primary election, general election, or special
election; and
(4)(A) Thirty (30) days after the end of the month in which the
last election is held at which the candidate seeks nomination or election.
(B) The report under subdivision (a)(4)(A) of this section
shall be the final report filed under this subsection.
(b) A report required under subsection (a) of this section shall
include:
(1) The same information pertaining to expenditures that is
required of candidates for office other than school district, township,
municipal, or county office as set forth in § 7-6-207(b)(1)(E)-(H);
(2) In the case of an individual making a noncandidate
expenditure:
(A) The name of the individual; and
(B)(i) The individual's principal place of business and
the postal zip code of principal residence.
(ii) If the individual has no principal place of
business or employer address, a report under subsection (a) of this section
shall include the individual's current occupation and home address;
(3) In the case of a noncandidate expenditure committee, the
name, address, employer, and occupation of the officers of the committee;
(4) In the case of a person that is not an individual or a
noncandidate expenditure committee, the principal name of the entity, the
entity's address, and the name, address, employer, and occupation of the
entity's officers; and
(5) For noncandidate expenditures made for the Office of Judge
of the Court of Appeals or the Office of Justice of the Supreme Court:
(A) The name and address of each person that made a
contribution or contributions that:
(i) Were used for noncandidate expenditures; and
01-16-2025 13:29:01 SSS009

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1043
(ii) In the aggregate exceeded two hundred fifty
dollars ($250);
(B) The contributing person's principal place of business,
employer, and occupation, the amount contributed, the date the contribution
was accepted by the person or noncandidate expenditure committee, and the
aggregate amount contributed for the noncandidate expenditures;
(C)(i) The name and address of each person that
contributed an item other than money that was used in furtherance of the
noncandidate expenditures, together with a description of the item, the date
of receipt, and the value.
(ii) This subdivision (b)(5)(C) does not apply to an
individual providing volunteer service.
(iii) If a person makes a contribution for a purpose
other than a noncandidate expenditure to an organization that contributed to
a noncandidate expenditure committee, the name and address of the person is
not required;
(D) The current balance of noncandidate expenditure
committee funds; and
(E) Any other information required by a rule of the
Arkansas Ethics Commission adopted before the date the contribution is
accepted.
(c) The report required under subsection (a) of this section shall be
verified by an affidavit of the person submitting the report stating that to
the best of his or her knowledge and belief the information disclosed is a
complete, true, and accurate financial statement of the contributions
received and made.
(d)(1) A report is timely filed if it is filed in electronic form
through the website of the Secretary of State on or before the date that the
report is due.
(2)(A) Reports shall be submitted to the Secretary of State in a
readable electronic format that is acceptable to the Secretary of State and
approved by the commission.
(B) The commission shall approve the format used by the
Secretary of State for the filing of noncandidate expenditure reports in
electronic form to ensure that all required information is captured.
(C) The website of the Secretary of State shall be
01-16-2025 13:29:01 SSS009

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1043
designed to allow for searches of noncandidate expenditure report information
filed in electronic form.
(3) A person, including a noncandidate expenditure committee,
may file reports in paper form under this section if all requirements are met
for alternative filing of reports by candidates under § 7-6-230.

7-6-237. Noncandidate expenditure committee – Registration.
(a)(1)(A) A noncandidate expenditure committee shall register with the
Secretary of State:
(i) Within fifteen (15) days after accepting
contributions that exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) in the aggregate
during a calendar year; and
(ii) Before making a noncandidate expenditure
pertaining to a candidate for the Office of Court of Appeals Judge or the
Office of Supreme Court Justice.
(B) Registration shall be:
(i) Annually renewed by January 15 unless the
noncandidate expenditure committee has ceased to exist; and
(ii) On a form provided by the Secretary of State,
and the contents of the form shall be verified by an affidavit of an officer
of the noncandidate expenditure committee.
(2) The noncandidate expenditure committee shall maintain for a
period of four (4) years records evidencing:
(A) The name, address, and place of employment of each
person that contributed to the noncandidate expenditure committee, along with
the amount contributed; and
(B) Each noncandidate expenditure made by the noncandidate
expenditure committee, along with the amount of each noncandidate
expenditure.
(3) The noncandidate expenditure committee:
(A) Shall designate a resident agent who shall be an
individual who resides in this state; and
(B) Shall not accept a contribution or make a noncandidate
expenditure unless the noncandidate expenditure committee has designated a
resident agent and registered under this section.
(4) An out-of-state noncandidate expenditure committee shall
01-16-2025 13:29:01 SSS009

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1043
comply with the registration and reporting requirements of this section if
the noncandidate expenditure committee makes one (1) noncandidate expenditure
or more than one (1) noncandidate expenditure within the State of Arkansas
that in the aggregate exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) during a calendar
year.
(b) The registration form of a noncandidate expenditure committee
shall be completed with the following information:
(1)(A) The name, address, and, when available, phone number of
the noncandidate expenditure committee and the name, address, phone number,
and place of employment of each of the officers of the noncandidate
expenditure committee.
(B) If the name of the noncandidate expenditure committee
is an acronym, then both the acronym and the words forming the acronym shall
be disclosed;
(2) The full name and street address, city, state, and zip code
of each financial institution the noncandidate expenditure committee uses for
purposes of receiving contributions or making noncandidate expenditures
within this state;
(3) A written acceptance of designation as resident agent from
the individual designated under subdivision (a)(3) of this section;
(4) A certification by an officer of the noncandidate
expenditure committee, under penalty of false swearing, that the information
provided on the registration form is correct; and
(5) A clause submitting the noncandidate expenditure committee
to the jurisdiction of the State of Arkansas for all purposes related to
compliance with this subchapter.
(c)(1) If a noncandidate expenditure committee makes a change to any
information required by subsection (b) of this section, an amendment shall be
filed with the Secretary of State within ten (10) days of the change.
(2) A noncandidate expenditure committee that fails to file an
amendment under subdivision (c)(1) of this section is subject to a late
filing fee of ten dollars ($10.00) for each day the amendment is not filed.

7-6-238. Noncandidate expenditures – Requirements.
(a) A noncandidate expenditure shall not be made:
(1) In arrangement, cooperation, or consultation between a
01-16-2025 13:29:01 SSS009

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1043
candidate or an authorized committee or agent of the candidate and the person
making the expenditure or an authorized agent of the person making the
expenditure; or
(2) In concert with or at the request or suggestion of a
candidate or an authorized committee or agent of the candidate.
(b)(1) A contributor to a noncandidate expenditure committee shall not
contribute funds received by transfer from another person.
(2) A person shall not solicit and receive contributions for the
purpose of transferring the contributions or a portion of them to a
noncandidate expenditure committee.
(3) Contributions to a noncandidate expenditure committee shall
comply with the limitations imposed on contributions to candidates and
independent expenditure committees under § 7-6-205.
(c) A noncandidate expenditure committee that makes a noncandidate
expenditure pertaining to a candidate for the Office of Judge of the Court of
Appeals or the Office of Justice of the Supreme Court shall maintain any
funds contributed for the purpose of the noncandidate expenditure pertaining
to the candidate for the Office of Judge of the Court of Appeals or the
Office of Justice of the Supreme Court in a segregated account.
(d)(1) A noncandidate expenditure committee that makes a noncandidate
expenditure pertaining to a candidate for the Office of Judge of the Court of
Appeals or the Office of Justice of the Supreme Court shall keep records of
all contributions and noncandidate expenditures in a manner sufficient to
demonstrate compliance with this subchapter.
(2) The records required under subdivision (d)(1) of this
section shall be:
(A) Made available to the Arkansas Ethics Commission and
the prosecuting attorney in the district in which the candidate resides; and
(B) Maintained for a period of four (4) years.
(e) The commission and the prosecuting attorney in the district in
which the candidate resides shall enforce this subchapter.

7-6-239. Noncandidate expenditures – Cause of action for violation.
(a)(1) A registered voter in this state may bring an action against a
noncandidate expenditure committee in circuit court to force compliance with
§§ 7-6-213, 7-6-231, and 7-6-234 – 7-6-236.
01-16-2025 13:29:01 SSS009

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1043
(2) The registered voter may bring an action in circuit court
pursuant to the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure to force compliance with
this subchapter.
(b) If the registered voter prevails in an action under this section,
he or she shall be entitled to reimbursement of expenses and reasonable
attorney's fees from the person whose action is enjoined.

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. Rules.
(a) The Arkansas Ethics Commission shall promulgate rules to implement
§§ 7-6-234 – 7-6-238.
(b) The commission shall file the initial rules with the Secretary of
State for adoption under § 25-15-204(f):
(1) On or before January 1, 2026; or
(2) If approval under § 10-3-309 has not occurred by January 1,
2026, as soon as practicable after approval under § 10-3-309.
(c) The commission shall file the proposed rule with the Legislative
Council under § 10-3-309(c) sufficiently in advance of January 1, 2026, so
that the Legislative Council may consider the rule for approval before
January 1, 2026.

SECTION 4. DO NOT CODIFY. Effective date for registration and
reporting requirements.
(a) The General Assembly finds that it is necessary to give sufficient
notice of the rules adopted by the Arkansas Ethics Commission in furtherance
of this act to noncandidate expenditure committees and other persons required
to register and report noncandidate contributions and noncandidate
expenditures under this act.
(b)(1) Therefore, the registration and reporting requirements created
by this act are not required for the 2026 nonpartisan judicial general
election held on the date of the preferential primary for other offices.
(2) The registration and reporting requirements created by this
act shall be required for the 2026 November nonpartisan judicial runoff
election, with registration and reporting to begin on July 1, 2026.

/s/A. Collins

01-16-2025 13:29:01 SSS009